Washington statutes.
RCW 27.48.050

Fund-raising for preservation and restoration of the state legislative building.

State officers and state employees, as those terms are defined in RCW 42.52.010, may engage in or encourage fund-raising activities including the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations specifically for the limited purpose of preservation and restoration of the state legislative building and related educational exhibits and programs.

[ 2002 c 167 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2002 c 167: "The legislature finds that the Washington state legislative building is an architecturally significant and irreplaceable building worthy of rehabilitation and enhancement. Not only is it a magnificent building, but it also reflects the essence of self-government and democracy in the state of Washington.

The legislature further finds that the state legislative building is an important asset to the citizens of Washington state, allowing them to learn about state government, to research and track legislative activity, to meet with state officials, and to participate in government.

The legislature further finds that a combination of public funds and private donations can involve the citizens of Washington state in the building's rehabilitation and enhancement by engaging the public in the preservation of the state legislative building and raising private funds for restoration and educational efforts." [ 2002 c 167 s 1.]

Effective date—2002 c 167: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 27, 2002]." [ 2002 c 167 s 4.]